Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-312
Department of Health and Human Services; rules and regulations; records and other communications; use by other agency or department.

The Department of Health and Human Services has the power to establish and enforce reasonable rules and regulations governing the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, files, and communications of the state. The use of such records, papers, files, and communications by any other agency or department of government to which they may be furnished shall be limited to the purposes for which they are furnished.

Laws 1941, c. 174, § 3, p. 684;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 68-340;

R.S.1943, § 68-312;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 29;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 295;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 240.